Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-473
Department; duties.

The department shall examine the rates paid for care for persons with cognitive impairment or dementia, including state spending for such care and reimbursement rates paid for such care under the medical assistance program pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act. The department shall make findings regarding cost-savings for providing care for persons with cognitive impairments or dementia in assisted-living facilities with a memory care endorsement. The department shall make recommendations regarding a higher or supplemental reimbursement rate for assisted-living facilities which have a memory care endorsement and provide care for persons with cognitive impairments or dementia at a savings to the state or medical assistance program.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 22.
July 21, 2016
Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.